Utah statutes.
41-6a-1408.   Abandoned vehicles -- Removal by peace officer -- Report --
Vehicle identification.
(1)  As used in this section, "abandoned vehicle" means a vehicle that is left
unattended:
(a)  on a highway for a period in excess of 48 hours; or
(b)  on public or private property for a period in excess of seven days
without express or implied consent of the owner or person in lawful possession
or control of the property.
(2)  A person may not abandon a vehicle on a highway.
(3)  A person may not abandon a vehicle on public or private property without
the express or implied consent of the owner or person in lawful possession or
control of the property.
(4)  A peace officer who has reasonable grounds to believe that a vehicle has
been abandoned may remove the vehicle or cause it to be removed in accordance
with Section 41-6a-1406.
(5)  If the motor number, manufacturer's number or identification mark of the
abandoned vehicle has been defaced, altered or obliterated, the vehicle may
not be released or sold until:
(a)  the original motor number, manufacturer's number or identification mark
has been replaced; or
(b)  a new number assigned by the Motor Vehicle Division has been stamped on
the vehicle.
